Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY

§431:3-201 Authority required. (a) No
person shall act as an insurer and no insurer shall transact insurance business
in this State other than as authorized by a certificate of authority granted to
it by the commissioner; except as to such transactions as are expressly
otherwise provided in this code.

(b) The investigation and adjustment of claims
in this State arising under insurance contracts issued by an unauthorized
insurer, except surplus line insurance issued pursuant to section 431:8-301,
shall be deemed to constitute the transaction of insurance in this State,
unless the same are isolated or nonrecurring transactions.

(c) Every certificate of authority shall
include but not be limited to:

(1) The name of the insurer and the classes of
insurance it is authorized to transact in this State; or

(2) The name of and location of the principal office
of its attorney-in-fact if a reciprocal insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
1993, c 205, §5; am L 2006, c 189, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next